Utah statutes.
63A-3-310.   Rules for implementing part.

The Board of Examiners may adopt rules for the implementation of this part, including rules for the conduct of hearings and appointment of hearing examiners.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 1993 General Session

